Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 3. Commissioned Officers.

§ 33-7-101.
Commissioned officers—how appointed.

The Governor as Commander in Chief shall appoint and commission, or warrant, all officers of the Mississippi National Guard other than noncommissioned officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-51; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 36, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-103.
Terms of office.

All officers of the Mississippi National Guard, except the Adjutant General, shall hold office until retired for age or disability, be honorably discharged at their own request, or be dismissed pursuant to a sentence of a general court-martial. The Governor may, however, at his discretion, refuse to accept the resignation of an officer. If an organization of the Mississippi National Guard be disbanded or mustered out of the service, such officers of said organization shall be put on the reserve list, subject to the further needs of the National Guard. If any officer of the Mississippi National Guard leaves the jurisdiction of the state and leaves his company or organization station for such a length of time that he ceases to exercise the functions of his commission or warrant so as to cease to be an officer in fact, his action will be deemed to have the effect of a resignation, and his commission may be terminated by the Governor. However, the Governor shall have the power to grant an officer a leave of absence for any reasonable length of time without prejudice to his commission or warrant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-52; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 37, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-105.
Oath of officer.

Every officer commissioned or warranted in the Mississippi National Guard shall, before entering upon his duties, take and subscribe to the following oath, which oath, signed by him and witnessed by an officer of the Mississippi National Guard, will be filed in the office of the Adjutant General, and all officers of the Mississippi National Guard are hereby empowered to administer this oath:

“I,_______________ , do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Mississippi against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and of the Governor of the State of Mississippi; that I make this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office of_______________in the National Guard of the United States and of the State of Mississippi upon which I am about to enter, so help me God.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-53; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 38, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-107.
Examinations required for commission.

Every person commissioned as an officer in the Mississippi National Guard shall, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, be examined as to his qualifications for office, and no person shall be appointed until he has passed a satisfactory examination as to his capacity, general qualifications and knowledge of military affairs proportionate to the requirements of the office to which he has been selected. The Commander in Chief may appoint examining boards to conduct such examinations, and when any candidate for commission shall fail to appear before a board, as directed, he shall be considered to have failed to qualify and the commission will not issue. The Commander in Chief may also convene examining boards to determine the fitness of officers for promotion and no officer will be promoted who has not passed a suitable examination as to his capacity, general qualifications and knowledge of military affairs proportionate to the requirements of the grade to which he is promoted. The Adjutant General shall prescribe in orders the subjects to be covered by, and the degree of proficiency to be required in each subject in examinations for commissions and promotions, for each grade, and the Governor shall make and cause to be published in orders, regulations governing the promotion of officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-54; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 39, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-109.
Assignment and transfer of officers.

Officers of all grades will be assigned to units or arms of the service and will be transferred from one unit or arm of the service to another by order of the commander in chief as the interest of the service may require; and all appointments will be by commission or warrant in the Mississippi National Guard, and not in any particular unit, and all commissions and warrants now in effect will be considered as such.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-55; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 40, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-111.
Dismissal of officers.

No officer of the National Guard shall be dismissed unless by reason of resignation, approval of findings of an efficiency or medical examining board, withdrawal of federal recognition, the sentence of a court-martial, or for cause as provided in sub-section (d) of this section.

The efficiency, moral character, competency, ability to properly perform his duty and general fitness for retention in the National Guard of any officer may be investigated and determined by an efficiency examining board.

The physical fitness for further service of any officer of the National Guard may be investigated by a medical examining board of officers.

Efficiency and medical examining boards consisting of three (3) or more officers shall be appointed by the Adjutant General upon recommendation of the commanding officer or the officer under investigation. All members of such boards shall be senior in grade to the officer under investigation, unless unavailable. Such boards shall be vested with the powers of courts of inquiry. Any officer ordered to appear before such a board shall be allowed to appear in person or by counsel, to cross-examine and to call witnesses in his behalf. He shall, at all stages of the proceedings, be allowed full access to records pertinent to his case and be furnished copies of the same. If the officer shall fail to appear at the time and place set for the hearing by the board, the board shall proceed to consider the evidence presented to it and make such findings as shall be warranted. If the findings of the board are unfavorable to an officer and are approved by the Governor, the Governor shall dismiss the officer, transfer him to the state retired list, or make such other order as may be appropriate.

Any officer who permanently moves from the state or who is absent without leave from drill, training and other duty for such a length of time that he ceases to exercise the function of his commission or warrant, or whose federal recognition is withdrawn may be dismissed automatically.

In any case in which the Adjutant General shall have grounds to believe an officer unfit, incompetent, or incapable of performing his duties, he may be dismissed or transferred to the reserve list or honorary National Guard, if appropriate, without reference to an efficiency or medical examining board, unless the officer so dismissed or transferred shall, within thirty (30) days after being notified thereof, serve upon the Adjutant General notice in writing demanding a hearing and examination before an appropriate board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-56; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 41, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-113.
Rank list of officers.

The Adjutant General shall publish annually a relative rank list of all officers in the Mississippi National Guard. Commissions or warrants of officers shall bear date of actual appointment by the Governor. Officers of each grade shall rank and take precedence according to the date of federal recognition of their respective commissions or warrants, and when two or more of the same grade are of the same date, their rank and precedence shall be determined by the length of service, continuous or otherwise, in the Mississippi National Guard or in the Armed Forces of the United States; and if for equal service, then by age, the older being the senior, provided, that an officer will not be credited with time spent on the state reserve or retired list in determining his lineal rank in the active list.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-57; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 42, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-115.
Senior officer on duty in command.

If different organizations of the National Guard of this state join in or do any state duty together, the highest ranking commissioned line or rated officer there on duty or in quarters shall command the whole and give orders for what is needful in the service unless otherwise specially directed by the Governor, according to the nature of the case.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-58; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 43, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-117.
Reserve list.

Commissioned officers or warrant officers who are surplus by reduction or disbandment of organization, by being relieved from duty or command, or by any other manner, shall be withdrawn from active service and placed on the state reserve list.

State reserve officers shall be subject to military law and to the jurisdiction of military courts in the same manner as officers on the active list.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-59; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 44, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-119.
Retired list.

There shall be a retired list of officers and enlisted men who have served with honor or distinction on the active list of the Mississippi National Guard, and all officers and enlisted men placed on the retired list shall remain thereon unless returned to the active list by the Governor or dismissed by a sentence of a court-martial. No officer or man on the retired list shall be required to perform any military duty whatsoever, but the Governor may, with their consent, detail officers and men on the retired list for recruiting duty, for duty on courts-martial, or for such other duty as they may be qualified. Officers and men on the retired list will be entitled to wear uniforms of their grade, and they shall be amenable to military laws and regulations and may be tried by courts-martial for military offenses as if on the active list.

Federally recognized officers and enlisted men of the National Guard of Mississippi shall be retired by order of the commander in chief with a promotion of one (1) grade, effective the date of retirement by action of the Adjutant General, upon receipt of the recommendation of the commanding officer of such retiring officer or enlisted man and upon completion of twenty (20) or more years of honorable service in the National Guard of Mississippi, the Armed Forces of the United States, or reserve components thereof, provided that any such officer or enlisted man shall be retired in the highest grade held, without promotion, unless the last sixty (60) months of such service was in a federally recognized status in the Mississippi National Guard or on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States. Any warrant officer holding the grade of highest chief warrant officer shall, upon retirement, be retired in that grade. Any enlisted man holding the highest authorized enlisted grade shall, upon retirement, be retired in that grade.

Whenever any officer or enlisted man shall have reached the age of sixty-four (64), he shall be placed on the retired list.

When any officer or enlisted man becomes permanently disabled or is physically disqualified for the performance of military duty by reason of wounds, injuries or illness, he may, upon his own application or in the discretion of the commander in chief, be ordered before a retiring board for examination as to his physical fitness for military service and, upon the recommendation of such board, may be placed upon the retired list. However, no officer or enlisted man shall be so placed upon the retired list because of physical disabilities which are the result of intemperance or improper habits or conduct upon his part.

For the purposes indicated under the preceding paragraph of this section, the Commander in Chief may appoint retiring boards, which shall be constituted and have cognizance of the same subjects and possess like powers as similar boards organized under the laws of the Armed Forces of the United States. The proceedings of retiring boards shall be assimilated to the forms and mode of procedure prescribed for like boards under the regulations for the Armed Forces of the United States.

A place on the retired list being a distinction given only in recognition of long and meritorious service, no officer or enlisted man will ever be retired whose service has not been honest and faithful. No officer or soldier will be retired as a means of punishment.

An officer upon the retired list who accepts a commission or warrant in the active militia or in the organized reserves of any component of the Armed Forces of the United States may, at any time, upon his own application, be placed upon the retired list with the rank with which he formerly retired. However, if his latest service in the active militia or in the organized reserves of any component of the Armed Forces of the United States was in a grade higher than that with which he was originally retired, he may be given such higher grade. An officer who has been retired with the increased rank under this article will not be returned to the active list with his increased rank, but with the same rank held on the active list at the time of retirement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-60; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 45; Laws, 1993, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1993).

§ 33-7-121.
Officers supply own uniforms.

All commissioned officers will provide themselves with such uniforms as may be prescribed for their use.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-61; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 46, eff from and after June 1, 1966.